Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2276.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 6018YH (4) 91 dg/ko H.F. 2276 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 232.121 Attorney fees ââ court 1 costs ââ child support. 2 If a court terminates the parental rights of a parent in 3 whole or in part because the parent was found to have engaged 4 in domestic abuse as defined in section 236.2, or was convicted 5 of assault as defined in section 708.1 against a family member, 6 the court shall order the parent whose parental rights were 7 terminated to pay court costs related to the termination, and 8 reasonable attorney fees the childâs other parent incurred due 9 to the termination of parental rights proceedings. 10 Sec. 2. Section 252A.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 11 following new subsection: 12 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. An individual is liable for the support 13 of a child if all of the following apply: 14 a. The individual had a parent-child relationship with the 15 child. 16 b. A court entered a support order requiring the individual 17 to pay for the support of the child, and the support order has 18 not terminated. 19 c. The child is under eighteen years of age. 20 d. After being ordered to pay for the childâs support, 21 the individualâs parental rights to the child were terminated 22 in whole or in part because the individual was found to have 23 engaged in domestic abuse as defined in section 236.2, or was 24 convicted of assault as defined in section 708.1 against a 25 family member. 26